Hawaii statutes.
§386-163 Administration. This part
shall be administered by the director of labor and industrial relations. The
director may promulgate such additional rules and regulations relative thereto
as the director deems necessary or convenient for carrying out the purposes of
this part. Procedure in respect of claims hereunder, including procedure upon
appeals, shall correspond to the procedure provided in this chapter, except
that notice of injury shall be given to the commanding officer of the unit to
which the injured person is attached and the commanding officer shall in turn
report the same to the division. [L 1963, c 116, pt of §1; Supp, §97-152; HRS
§386-163; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next